Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.100

Submission of plan or amendments thereto to certain state departments—Approval.

Prior to the commencement of actual work on any plan or amendment thereto approved by the board, it must be submitted for written approval to the Washington department of social and health services and to the Washington department of ecology.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 5; 1967 c 72 s 10.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.